Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB232.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 258 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Claim" means a claim for damages resulting from a dog bite or dog
attack;
(b) "Claimant" means a person alleging entitlement to damages resulting from
a dog bite or dog attack; and
(c) "Written request" means a written request that:
1. Sets forth:
a. The specific nature of each claim being made by the claimant;
b. A request for the information required under this section; and
c. The contact information for replying to the claimant or the
claimant's attorney; and
2. Is delivered through the United States Postal Service, a common
carrier, or other third-party delivery service in a manner that produces
a return receipt or other proof of delivery from the third-party service
or carrier.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, within thirty (30) days of
receiving a written request from a claimant or a claimant's attorney, any dog
owner or other person that is alleged by the claimant to be liable for damages
resulting from a dog bite or dog attack shall:
(a) Disclose, in writing, to the claimant or the claimant's attorney:
1. The name of each known insurer that provides or may provide liability
or casualty insurance coverage, including excess or umbrella
insurance coverage, to the owner or person; and
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/30/2024 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 960
2. Whether the owner or person is self-insured, in whole or in part; and
(b) Forward the written request to all insurers named under paragraph (a)1. of
this subsection.
(3) (a) 1. An insurer shall comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection if:
a. The insurer receives a written request from a dog owner or other
person under subsection (2)(b) of this section;
b. The insurer receives both of the following from a claimant or a
claimant's attorney:
i. A written request; and
ii. The disclosure provided to the claimant or the claimant's
attorney under subsection (2)(a)1. of this section that
identifies the insurer; or
c. Both of the following are satisfied:
i. The insurer receives a written request from a claimant or a
claimant's attorney; and
ii. The insurer provides or may provide liability or casualty
insurance coverage, including excess or umbrella
insurance coverage, to a dog owner or other person
identified in the written request received under subpart i. of
this subdivision.
2. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the insurer shall
comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection within thirty (30)
days of the earliest request received under subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph.
(b) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (c) of this subsection, an insurer
required to comply with this paragraph shall provide the following to
the claimant or the claimant's attorney for each known insurance
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/30/2024 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 960
policy or contract that provides or may provide liability or casualty
insurance coverage, including excess or umbrella insurance coverage,
for the claimant's claim or claims:
a. The name of the insurer;
b. The name of each insured; and
c. The limits of coverage.
2. The information required under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph
shall be provided in a written statement that is:
a. Taken under oath; and
b. Signed by a corporate officer or the insurer's claims manager.
(c) In lieu of complying with paragraph (b) of this subsection, an insurer may
provide a claimant or a claimant's attorney a copy of the declaration page of
each known insurance policy or contract that provides or may provide
liability or casualty insurance coverage, including excess or umbrella
insurance coverage, for the claimant's claim or claims.
(4) (a) If a dog owner, other person, or insurer receives a written request that does
not contain sufficient information to allow the owner, person, or insurer to
provide the information required under this section, the owner, person, or
insurer shall, within five (5) business days of receipt of the written request,
provide written notice to the claimant or claimant's attorney that:
1. There is not sufficient information in the written request to allow
compliance with this section; and
2. States, specifically, what additional information is necessary to allow
compliance with this section.
(b) The time period for providing information under this section shall be tolled
until the dog owner, other person, or insurer receives sufficient information
to allow the owner, person, or insurer to provide the information required
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/30/2024 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 960
under this section.
(5) (a) A dog owner, other person, or insurer shall amend any information
provided under this section that is incorrect or incomplete.
(b) The amendment shall be provided in writing to the claimant or the
claimant's attorney not later than five (5) business days after discovery of
the error or missing information.
(6) The disclosure of information by an owner, other person, or insurer to a claimant
or a claimant's attorney under this section shall not be construed:
(a) As a waiver of any defenses to coverage that may be available to the insurer;
(b) As an acceptance or admission of liability; or
(c) To waive Rule 411 of the Kentucky Rules of Evidence or any other
relevancy standard or rule of admissibility.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
All insurers, and other persons subject to regulation under this chapter, shall comply
with Section 1 of this Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/30/2024 12:33 PM Jacketed